Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-3-101. Successor to rights and obligations of counties and cities.

Any metropolitan government created and established pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title shall acquire and succeed to all rights, obligations, duties and privileges of the county and of the cities consolidating; and, without the necessity or formality of deed, bill of sale or other instrument of transfer, the metropolitan government shall be and become the owner of all property previously belonging to the county and cities.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 21; T.C.A., § 6-3720.

Cross-References. Taxation by counties and municipalities, §§67-5-102,67-5-103.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Municipalities have the authority to enact child curfew laws, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

Unless and until the legislature enacts legislation implementing a state lottery, which would include authorization for the sale of lottery tickets statewide, a local government may enact an ordinance prohibiting the sale of lottery tickets within its jurisdiction, OAG 03-004, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/17/03).

Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

Regulation of distribution of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine by local governments. OAG 13-99, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 102 (12/6/13).

7-3-102. Federal and state aid.

Any metropolitan government created and established pursuant to chapters 1-3 of this title shall be entitled to receive as state aid or as grant-in-aid from the state of Tennessee, from the United States or from any other agency, public or private, all funds to which a county is, or may hereafter be, entitled, and also all funds to which an incorporated city or municipality is or may hereafter be entitled and to receive the funds without diminution or loss by reason of a consolidation made as provided in chapters 1-3 of this title.

The metropolitan government shall be deemed a county and shall also be deemed an incorporated city or municipality for the purpose of determining its right to receive, and for the purpose of receiving, state aid or grant-in-aid from the state of Tennessee, from the United States or from any other agency.

When state aid or other grant-in-aid is distributed to any county on the basis of population or area, or both, then the entire population and the total area of the county in which such metropolitan government is established shall be considered in calculating and determining the basis of such distribution.

When state aid or other grant-in-aid is distributed to any county on the basis of rural area, rural road mileage or rural population, or any combination thereof, then that area of the general services district outside of the urban services district shall be deemed to constitute rural area, its road mileage to constitute rural road mileage and its population to constitute rural population.

When state aid or other grant-in-aid is distributed to any incorporated city or municipality on the basis of population or area, or both, then the population and the area of the urban services district shall be deemed the population and the area of the metropolitan government in calculating and determining the basis of such distribution.

Acts 1957, ch. 120, § 11; T.C.A., § 6-3712.

Attorney General Opinions. State-shared taxes and metropolitan governments, OAG 99-138, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170 (7/22/99).

7-3-103. Reapportionment.

Notwithstanding any general law or metropolitan charter to the contrary, the planning commission of any county having a metropolitan form of government shall recommend to the metropolitan council that councilmanic districts or school districts or both be reapportioned for either or both of the following reasons:

To more closely conform the boundary lines of such districts to the boundary lines of state senate and state house of representatives districts in order to minimize voter inconvenience, to avoid split precincts, and to substantially reduce the expense of conducting elections in the county; and

To correct drafting or typographical errors appearing in a previously adopted ordinance of reapportionment.

If the planning commission determines that such districts should be reapportioned for either or both of the reasons enumerated by subdivision (a)(1), then the commission shall submit a proposed ordinance designed to accomplish its recommendations. The metropolitan council shall then act upon such ordinance in the procedural manner prescribed by controlling general law or metropolitan charter for other duly presented ordinances of reapportionment.

The authority to reapportion granted by subsection (a) shall not be exercised more than once in regard to any ordinance of reapportionment that was previously enacted in direct response to either a federal decennial census or a court order.

Acts 1982, ch. 615, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The First Amendment and Distributional Voting Rights Controversies (Emily M. Calhoun), 52 Tenn. L. Rev. 549 (1985).

7-3-104. Representation of county employees by employee organizations.

For any county with a metropolitan form of government that has adopted a labor policy establishing the right of its employees to join an employee organization and that has a procedure for establishing exclusive representation status of an employee organization, an employee may be represented before any board, agency, civil service commission, hearing officer, or other body empowered to impose discipline or otherwise deal with wages, hours, and working conditions of employees by a representative from the employee organization that has been designated as the exclusive representative for such employees. Any such employee shall be entitled to select a spokesperson or representative for the purpose of providing aid and assistance in any proceeding before any such board, agency, commission, hearing officer, or entity, notwithstanding any other code section to the contrary. Such assistance or representation by a member or employee of the exclusive representative for such employee shall not be considered “law practice” or “law business” as may be defined in the Tennessee Code Annotated. Such representation does not include representation in any court of law, or in any judicial proceeding. Nothing in this section prevents such employee from being represented by an attorney if the employee or the exclusive representative so chooses.

Acts 1996, ch. 1078, § 1.

Cross-References. “Law business,” “practice of law” defined, §23-3-101.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of nonlawyer representation before civil service commission, OAG 97-164, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 185 (12/16/97).

7-3-105. Guaranteed payment plan for superseded retirement systems.

As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Metropolitan board of public education” means the local board of education of a metropolitan government, as defined in subdivision (a)(2);

“Metropolitan government” means any metropolitan government established under this title; and

“Superseded system” means any closed local city or county retirement plan, except “superseded system” does not include any retirement plan closed after June 30, 1994. “Superseded system” further means any closed city teacher retirement plan, closed county teacher plan or closed local teacher retirement plan in existence prior to June 23, 2000.

The local legislative body of a metropolitan government, as defined in subdivision (a)(2), and its local board of education may adopt a guaranteed payment plan for pension liabilities as follows:

Adoption of a guaranteed payment plan must be approved by an ordinance approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the local legislative body of the metropolitan government and by resolution approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the metropolitan board of public education; and

The guaranteed payment plan must cover all superseded systems of the metropolitan government and the metropolitan board of public education.

Funding obligations of the superseded system, including the funding of any unfunded accrued liabilities of the superseded system, shall be determined in a manner so as to amortize the funding obligations over a period of time established by the local legislative body, such period not to exceed thirty (30) years from the beginning of the fiscal year in which the guaranteed payment plan is adopted by the metropolitan government. Any benefit improvements granted by the superseded system shall be fully funded over the same amortization period established by this subsection (b). Appropriations made by the local legislative body to fund the obligations of the superseded system pursuant to this section may not be reduced by any year until all of the pension obligations of the superseded system are fully amortized.

The metropolitan board of public education shall fund in its annual budget the actuarial contribution attributable to the aggregate benefits of all teachers covered under the superseded systems established upon or after the establishment of the metropolitan government. The metropolitan government shall fund the actuarial contribution attributable to the aggregate benefits of all other superseded systems. The amounts necessary to fund such actuarial contributions shall be set forth in the annual budget adopted by the local legislative body.

A metropolitan government establishing a guaranteed payment plan for pension liabilities pursuant to this section shall establish a guaranteed payment account, which shall be separate and apart from the pension trust funds of any superseded system. All funds appropriated by the local legislative body for funding the obligation of the superseded system shall be directly transferred to the guaranteed payment account by the chief accountant of the metropolitan government or, in the absence of a chief accountant, the person who otherwise performs the duties of a chief accountant for a metropolitan government. The chief accountant shall transfer such amounts as may be necessary to pay the current benefit distributions of the superseded system to each respective system and shall transfer all remaining balances to the credit of the trust funds of the respective superseded systems in such amounts as are required to ensure that all liabilities are fully amortized as required by this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 935, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 935, § 2 provided that it is the legislative intent that this section shall not be interpreted to change the charter of any metropolitan government electing to come under its provisions.

Acts 2000, ch. 935, § 3 provided that no pension benefit granted prior to June 23, 2000, to any member of any superseded system shall be reduced as a result of a metropolitan government electing to come under the provisions of this section. Neither shall this section be construed to limit the authority of any superseded system to grant benefit improvements; provided, no benefit improvements shall be effective unless funded in accordance with the provisions of this section, by an additional appropriation made by the local legislative body prior to their effective date.